Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-523
Department of Health and Human Services; reports.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall make such reports to the Department of Health and Human Services of the United States in such form and containing such information as such department may from time to time require, and the department shall comply with such provisions as necessary to assure the correctness of such reports.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 23, p. 188;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-523;

R.S.1943, § 43-523;

Laws 1961, c. 204, § 2, p. 612;

Laws 1961, c. 415, § 4, p. 1246;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 170;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 119.